vi: Trưởng thành > Vũ khí và Phụ kiện vũ khí: Bảo quản vũ khí & phụ kiện; Vũ khí
de: Reif > Waffen und Waffenzubehör: Waffenpflege und Zubehör; Waffen
fi: Aikuiset > Aseet ja asetarvikkeet: Aseiden hoito- ja lisätarvikkeet; Aseet
ja: 成人向け > 武器&武器関連用品: 武器手入れ&関連用品; 武器
zh-TW: 成人用品 > 武器配件: 武器保養/配件; 武器
pt-PT: Para adultos > Armas e acessórios para armas: Manutenção e acessórios de armas; Armas
fr: Mature > Armes et accessoires d’armes: Entretien des armes et accessoires; Armes
lt-LT: Prekės suaugusiesiems > Ginklai ir ginklų priedai: Ginklų priežiūra ir priedai; Ginklai
el: Είδη ενηλίκων > Όπλα & αξεσουάρ Όπλων: Φροντίδα & αξεσουάρ όπλων; Όπλα (Weapons)
en: Mature > Weapons & Weapon Accessories: Weapon Care & Accessories; Weapons
bg-BG: За възрастни > Оръжия и аксесоари за оръжие: Грижа за оръжие и аксесоари; Оръжия
it: Articoli per adulti > Armi e accessori per armi: Accessori e pulizia armi; Armi
zh-CN: 成人 > 武器/武器配件: 武器保养/配件; 武器
sv: Avsett för vuxna > Vapen och vapentillbehör: Vapenvård och tillbehör; Vapen
tr: Yetişkinlere Yönelik Ürünler > Silahlar ve Silah Aksesuarları: Silah Bakımı ve Aksesuarları; Silahlar
da: Voksne > Våben og våbentilbehør: Våbenpleje og tilbehør; Våben
nl: Volwassenen > Wapens en wapenaccessoires: Accessoires en onderhoud voor vuurwapens; Wapens
sl-SI: Odrasla vsebina > Orožje in dodatki za orožje: Nega in dodatki za orožje; Orožje
hr-HR: Za odrasle > Oružje i pribor za oružje: Pribor za održavanje oružja; Oružja
hu: Érett > Fegyverek és fegyverkiegészítők: Fegyverápolás és -kiegészítők; Fegyverek
ru: Товары для взрослых > Оружие и аксессуары для него: Товары для ухода за оружием и аксессуары; Оружие
sk-SK: Dospelý > Zbrane a príslušenstvo k zbraniam: Starostlivosť o zbrane a príslušenstvo; Zbrane
es: Productos para adultos > Armas y accesorios para armas: Accesorios y cuidado para armas de fuego; Armas
nb: Voksen > Våpen og våpentilbehør: Våpenpleie og -tilbehør; Våpen
pt-BR: Adultos > Armas e acessórios para armas: Acessórios e cuidados para armas; Armas
ko: 성인용 제품 > 무기/무기 부대용품: 무기 관리용품/부대용품; 무기
cs: Pro dospělé > Zbraně a příslušenství ke zbraním: Péče o zbraně a příslušenství; Zbraně
pl: Dojrzały > Broń i akcesoria do broni: Konserwacja i akcesoria do broni palnej; Broń
ro-RO: Adulți > Arme și accesorii pentru arme: Îngrijirea armelor și accesorii; Arme
th: สำหรับผู้ใหญ่ > อาวุธและอุปกรณ์เสริมอาวุธ: อุปกรณ์ดูแลและตกแต่งอาวุธ; อาวุธ